Nebraska, session 109, LB580.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB580 LB580
2025 2025
Section 1. Any remaining funds in the Lead Service Line Cash Fund
are hereby reappropriated for FY2025-26 to the Department of Environment
and Energy for the purpose of lead service line replacements in
accordance with section 71-5328. Any remaining funds in the Lead Service
Line Cash Fund not allocated for qualified labor training organizations
are hereby reappropriated for FY2025-26 to the Department of Environment
and Energy for purposes of providing grants to metropolitan utilities
districts for lead service line replacements in accordance with section
71-5328.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-